District of Columbia statutes.
2-354.10

General Services Administration schedules.

(a)

The CPO may procure goods or services through a General Services Administration schedule pursuant to 40 U.S.C. § 502(a)(3) and 40 U.S.C. § 602(c).

(b)

The CPO shall ensure that the price of any contract entered into under subsection (a) of this section is reasonable.

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 410, 58 DCR 1185

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-354.01.